Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-150
Rate deaveraging.

No telecommunications company shall be required to deaverage its wholesale basic local exchange rates to reflect the differences in the costs of providing basic local exchange service in the various exchanges that the telecommunications company serves until the retail basic local exchange rates for those exchanges are also deaveraged or until funds are disbursed to such telecommunications company from federal or state universal service or high-cost funds to offset the higher-than-average costs which such telecommunications company incurs in serving high-cost exchanges.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 49.